Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Oversight of Medical Care Programs.

Sec. 47.05.200.
Annual audits.

The department shall annually contract for independent audits of a statewide sample of all medical assistance providers in order to identify overpayments and violations of criminal statutes. The audits conducted under this section may not be conducted by the department or employees of the department. The number of audits under this section may not be less than 50 each year. The audits under this section must include both on-site audits and desk audits and must be of a variety of provider types. The department may not award a contract under this subsection to an organization that does not retain persons with a significant level of expertise and recent professional practice in the general areas of standard accounting principles and financial auditing and in the specific areas of medical records review, investigative research, and Alaska health care criminal law. The contractor, in consultation with the commissioner, shall select the providers to be audited and decide the ratio of desk audits and on-site audits to the total number selected. In identifying providers who are subject to an audit under this section, the department shall attempt to minimize concurrent state or federal audits.

Within 90 days after receiving each audit report from an audit conducted under this section, the department shall begin administrative procedures to recoup overpayments identified in the audits and shall allocate the reasonable and necessary financial and human resources to ensure prompt recovery of overpayments unless the attorney general has advised the commissioner in writing that a criminal investigation of an audited provider has been or is about to be undertaken, in which case, the commissioner shall hold the administrative procedure in abeyance until a final charging decision by the attorney general has been made. The commissioner shall provide copies of all audit reports to the attorney general so that the reports can be screened for the purpose of bringing criminal charges. The department may assess interest and penalties on any identified overpayment. Interest under this subsection shall be calculated using the statutory rates for postjudgment interest accruing from the date of the issuance of the final agency decision to recoup overpayments identified in the audit. In this subsection, the date of issuance of the final agency decision is the later of the date of

the department’s written notification of the decision and the provider’s appeal rights; or

if timely appealed by the provider, a final agency decision under AS

44.64.060

.

Each fiscal year, the state’s share of recovered overpayments obtained because of the required contract audits under this section shall be deposited with the commissioner of revenue under AS

37.10.050

and separately accounted for by the commissioner of administration under AS

37.05.142

. The legislature may appropriate a portion of the estimated balance in the account to the department to pay for the annual audits described in this section.

As a condition of obtaining payment under AS 47.07 and AS 47.08 and for purposes of this section, a provider shall allow

the department reasonable access to the records of medical assistance recipients and providers; and

audit and inspection of the records by state and federal agencies.

This section does not preclude the department from performing audits that are allowed or required under other laws.

History.

(§ 3 ch 66 SLA 2003; am §§ 40, 41 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For program participation — administrative remedies and sanctions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 27.

For audit and appeal, see 7 AAC 43, art. 31.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, in (a), inserted “may not be less than 50” preceding “each year”, deleted “, as a total for the medical assistance programs under AS 47.07 and AS 47.08, shall be .75 percent of all enrolled providers under the programs, adjusted annually on July 1, as determined by the department, except that the number of audits under this section may not be less than 75” following “each year”, added the last sentence; in (b), added the language beginning “The department may assess interest” to the end of the subsection.

Sec. 47.05.210.
Medical assistance fraud.

A person commits the crime of medical assistance fraud if the person

knowingly submits or authorizes the submission of a claim to a medical assistance agency for property, services, or a benefit with reckless disregard that the claimant is not entitled to the property, services, or benefit;

knowingly prepares or assists another person to prepare a claim for submission to a medical assistance agency for property, services, or a benefit with reckless disregard that the claimant is not entitled to the property, services, or benefit;

except as otherwise authorized under the medical assistance program, confers, offers to confer, solicits, agrees to accept, or accepts property, services, or a benefit

to refer a medical assistance recipient to a health care provider; or

for providing health care to a medical assistance recipient if the property, services, or benefit is in addition to payment by a medical assistance agency;

does not produce medical assistance records to a person authorized to request the records;

knowingly makes a false entry in or falsely alters a medical assistance record;

knowingly destroys, mutilates, suppresses, conceals, removes, or otherwise impairs the verity, legibility, or availability of a medical assistance record knowing that the person lacks the authority to do so; or

violates a provision of AS 47.07 or AS 47.08 or a regulation adopted under AS 47.07 or AS 47.08.

Medical assistance fraud under (a)(1), (2), or (3) of this section is

a class B felony if the portion of the claim or claims submitted in violation of (a)(1) or (2) of this section, or the value of the property, services, or benefit that is in violation of (a)(3) of this section, is $25,000 or more;

a class C felony if the portion of the claim or claims submitted in violation of (a)(1) or (2) of this section, or the value of the property, services, or benefit that is in violation of (a)(3) of this section, is $500 or more but less than $25,000;

a class A misdemeanor if the portion of the claim or claims submitted in violation of (a)(1) or (2) of this section, or the value of the property, services, or benefit that is in violation of (a)(3) of this section, is less than $500.

Medical assistance fraud under (a)(4), (5), or (6) of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

Medical assistance fraud under (a)(7) of this section is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 66 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For program participation — administrative remedies and sanctions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 27.

For recipient rights and responsibilities, and program integrity, see 7 AAC 100, art. 14.

Sec. 47.05.220.
Notice of charges.

Upon the filing of a complaint, information, presentment, or indictment charging a medical assistance provider with a crime under AS

47.05.210

, the attorney general shall, in writing, notify the commissioner of the filing. Upon receiving notice from the attorney general under this section, the commissioner shall immediately undertake a review of all unpaid claims or requests for reimbursements attributable to services claimed to have been provided by the person charged.

History.

(§ 3 ch 66 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For program participation — administrative remedies and sanctions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 27.

Sec. 47.05.230.
Determination of value; aggregation of amounts.

In AS

47.05.210

, whenever it is necessary to determine the value of property, that value shall be determined in accordance with AS

11.46.980

. In determining the degree or classification of a crime described under AS

47.05.210

, amounts involved in criminal acts committed under one course of conduct, whether from the same person or several persons, shall be aggregated.

History.

(§ 3 ch 66 SLA 2003)

Sec. 47.05.235.
Duty to identify and repay self-identified overpayments.

Unless a provider is being audited under AS

47.05.200(a)

, an enrolled medical assistance provider shall conduct a biennial review or audit of a statistically valid sample of claims submitted to the department for reimbursement. If overpayments are identified, the medical assistance provider shall report the overpayment to the department not later than 10 business days after identification of the overpayment. The report must also identify how the medical assistance provider intends to repay the department. After the department receives the report, the medical assistance provider and the department shall enter into an agreement establishing a schedule for repayment of the identified overpayment. The agreement may authorize repayment in a lump sum, in a payment plan, or by offsetting future billings, as approved by the department.

The department may not assess interest or penalties on an overpayment identified and repaid by a medical assistance provider under this section.

History.

(§ 42 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 42, ch. 25, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on September 19, 2016.

Sec. 47.05.240.
Exclusion from medical assistance programs.

The commissioner may exclude an applicant to or disenroll a medical assistance provider in the medical assistance program in AS 47.07 or AS 47.08, or both, for a period of up to 10 years after unconditional discharge on a conviction

for medical assistance fraud under AS

47.05.210

or misconduct involving a controlled substance under AS 11.71; or

in a court of the United States or a court of another state or territory, for a crime with elements similar to the crimes included under (1) of this subsection.

After a period of exclusion under (a) of this section, an applicant may not participate in a medical assistance program under AS 47.07 or AS 47.08 until the applicant establishes to the commissioner by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant possesses all required licenses and certificates and is qualified to participate.

History.

(§ 3 ch 66 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For recipient rights and responsibilities, and program integrity, see 7 AAC 100, art. 14.

Sec. 47.05.250.
Civil penalties.

The department may assess a civil penalty against a provider who violates this chapter, AS 47.07, or regulations adopted under this chapter or AS 47.07.

The department shall adopt regulations establishing a range of civil penalties that the department may assess against a provider under this section. In establishing the range of civil penalties, the department shall take into account appropriate factors, including the seriousness of the violation, the service provided by the provider, and the severity of the penalty. The regulations may not provide for a civil penalty of less than $100 or more than $25,000 for each violation.

The provisions of this section are in addition to any other remedies available under this chapter, AS 47.07, or regulations adopted under this chapter or AS 47.07.

A provider against whom a civil penalty of less than $2,500 is assessed may appeal the decision assessing the penalty to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee. The commissioner shall, by regulation, establish time limits and procedures for an appeal under this subsection. The decision of the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee may be appealed to the office of administrative hearings established under AS 44.64.

A provider against whom a civil penalty of $2,500 or more is assessed may appeal the decision assessing the penalty to the office of administrative hearings established under AS 44.64.

History.

(§ 43 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 43, ch. 25, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on September 19, 2016.

Sec. 47.05.270.
Medical assistance reform program.

The department shall adopt regulations to design and implement a program for reforming the state medical assistance program under AS 47.07. The reform program must include

referrals to community and social support services, including career and education training services available through the Department of Labor and Workforce Development under AS 23.15, the University of Alaska, or other sources;

electronic distribution of an explanation of medical assistance benefits to recipients for health care services received under the program;

expanding the use of telehealth for primary care, behavioral health, and urgent care;

enhancing fraud prevention, detection, and enforcement;

reducing the cost of behavioral health, senior, and disabilities services provided to recipients of medical assistance under the state’s home and community-based services waiver under AS

47.07.045

;

pharmacy initiatives;

enhanced care management;

redesigning the payment process by implementing fee agreements that include one or more of the following:

premium payments for centers of excellence;

penalties for hospital-acquired infections, readmissions, and outcome failures;

bundled payments for specific episodes of care; or

global payments for contracted payers, primary care managers, and case managers for a recipient or for care related to a specific diagnosis;

stakeholder involvement in setting annual targets for quality and cost-effectiveness;

to the extent consistent with federal law, reducing travel costs by requiring a recipient to obtain medical services in the recipient’s home community, to the extent appropriate services are available in the recipient’s home community;

guidelines for health care providers to develop health care delivery models supported by evidence-based practices that encourage wellness and disease prevention.

The department shall, in coordination with the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority, efficiently manage a comprehensive and integrated behavioral health program that uses evidence-based, data-driven practices to achieve positive outcomes for people with mental health or substance abuse disorders and children with severe emotional disturbances. The goal of the program is to assist recipients of services under the program to recover by achieving the highest level of autonomy with the least dependence on state-funded services possible for each person. The program must include

a plan for providing a continuum of community-based services to address housing, employment, criminal justice, and other relevant issues;

services from a wide array of providers and disciplines, including licensed or certified mental health and primary care professionals; and

efforts to reduce operational barriers that fragment services, minimize administrative burdens, and reduce the effectiveness and efficiency of the program.

The department shall identify the areas of the state where improvements in access to telehealth would be most effective in reducing the costs of medical assistance and improving access to health care services for medical assistance recipients. The department shall make efforts to improve access to telehealth for recipients in those locations. The department may enter into agreements with Indian Health Service providers, if necessary, to improve access by medical assistance recipients to telehealth facilities and equipment.

On or before November 15 of each year, the department shall prepare a report and submit the report to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report must include

realized cost savings related to reform efforts under this section;

realized cost savings related to medical assistance reform efforts undertaken by the department other than the reform efforts described in this section;

a statement of whether the department has met annual targets for quality and cost-effectiveness;

recommendations for legislative or budgetary changes related to medical assistance reforms during the next fiscal year;

changes in federal laws that the department expects will result in a cost or savings to the state of more than $1,000,000;

a description of any medical assistance grants, options, or waivers the department applied for in the previous fiscal year;

the results of demonstration projects the department has implemented;

legal and technological barriers to the expanded use of telehealth, improvements in the use of telehealth in the state, and recommendations for changes or investments that would allow cost-effective expansion of telehealth;

the percentage decrease in costs of travel for medical assistance recipients compared to the previous fiscal year;

the percentage decrease in the number of medical assistance recipients identified as frequent users of emergency departments compared to the previous fiscal year;

the percentage increase or decrease in the number of hospital readmissions within 30 days after a hospital stay for medical assistance recipients compared to the previous fiscal year;

the percentage increase or decrease in state general fund spending for the average medical assistance recipient compared to the previous fiscal year;

the percentage increase or decrease in uncompensated care costs incurred by medical assistance providers compared to the percentage change in private health insurance premiums for individual and small group health insurance;

the cost, in state and federal funds, for providing optional services under AS

47.07.030(b)

;

the amount of state funds saved as a result of implementing changes in federal policy authorizing 100 percent federal funding for services provided to American Indian and Alaska Native individuals eligible for Medicaid, and the estimated savings in state funds that could have been achieved if the department had fully implemented the changes in policy.

In this section, “telehealth” means the practice of health care delivery, evaluation, diagnosis, consultation, or treatment, using the transfer of health care data through audio, visual, or data communications, performed over two or more locations between providers who are physically separated from the recipient or from each other or between a provider and a recipient who are physically separated from each other.

History.

(§ 43 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Except for paragraphs (a)(5), (8), and (10), this section took effect under sec. 43, ch. 25, SLA 2016, on September 19, 2016.
Paragraphs (a)(5), (8), and (10) were subject to a condition and took effect September 15, 2017, under secs. 43, and 61 — 64, ch. 25, SLA 2016, after the condition was satisfied.

Sec. 47.05.290.
Definitions.

In AS

47.05.200

—

47.05.290

,

“benefit” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“claim” includes a request for payment for medical assistance services under applicable state or federal law or regulations, whether the request is in an electronic format or paper format or both;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“falsely alters” has the meaning given in AS

11.46.580

;

“knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“makes a false entry” has the meaning given in AS

11.56.820

;

“medical assistance agency” means the department, an agency of the department, and an agent, contractor, or designee of the department or of one of its agencies that performs one or more of the activities of the department or an agency of the department;

“medical assistance program” means a program under AS 47.07 or AS 47.08;

“medical assistance provider” or “provider” means a person or organization that provides, attempts to provide, or claims to have provided services or products to a medical assistance recipient that may qualify for reimbursement under AS 47.07 or AS 47.08 or a person or organization that participates in or has applied to participate in a medical assistance program as a supplier of a service or product;

“medical assistance recipient” means a person on whose behalf another claims or receives a payment from a medical assistance agency, without regard to whether the individual was eligible for benefits under a medical assistance program;

“medical assistance record” means records required to be kept by state or federal law or regulation regarding claims to a medical assistance agency;

“organization” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“property” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“reckless disregard” means acting recklessly, as that term is defined in AS

11.81.900

;

“services” or “medical assistance services” means a health care benefit that may qualify for reimbursement under AS 47.07 or AS 47.08, including health care benefits provided, attempted to be provided, or claimed to have been provided to another, by a medical assistance provider, or “services” as defined in AS

11.81.900

;

“unconditional discharge” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 66 SLA 2003)